src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohoomishinaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoomishinaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoomishinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoomishinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoomishinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoomishinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoomishinaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomishinaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomishinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoomishiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoomishiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoomishiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoomishiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoomishiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoomishiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoomishiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoomishiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoomishiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomishiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomishiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoomishiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoomishiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoomishiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoomishiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoomishiwaadigag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohoonyimishinaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishinaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaanidigag
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: nigookookohoonsimishinaanidigan
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishinaanidiging
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonyimishinaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishinaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonyimishiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonyimishiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaadigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonsimishinaanidigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishinaanidiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishinaanidigag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: gigookookohoonsimishiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: gigookookohoonsimishiwaadigan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishiwaadiging
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonyimishiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonyimishiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaadigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonsimishiniidigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiniidiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiniidigag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+4: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Prt+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+4: ogookookohoonsimishiwaadigan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiwaadiging
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3+Pl+Voc+Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaadigag
     
